Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202017-174
City of second class; public passenger transportation system; acquire; accept funds; administration; powers.

A city of the second class shall have the power by ordinance to acquire, by the exercise of the power of eminent domain or otherwise, lease, purchase, construct, own, maintain, and operate, or contract for the operation of public passenger transportation systems, excluding railroad systems, including all property and facilities required for such public passenger transportation systems, within and without the limits of the city, to redeem such property from prior encumbrance in order to protect or preserve the interest of the city in such property, to exercise all powers granted by the Constitution and laws of the State of Nebraska, including, but not limited to, receiving and accepting from the government of the United States or any agency thereof, from the State of Nebraska or any subdivision thereof, and from any person or corporation, donations, devises, gifts, bequests, loans, or grants for or in aid of the acquisition, operation, and maintenance of such public passenger transportation systems, and to administer, hold, use, and apply the same for the purposes for which such donations, devises, gifts, bequests, loans, or grants may have been made, to negotiate with employees and enter into contracts of employment, to employ by contract or otherwise individuals singularly or collectively, to enter into agreements authorized under the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint Public Agency Act, and to exercise such other and further powers with respect thereto as may be necessary, incident, or appropriate to the powers of such city.

Laws 1975, LB 395, § 2;

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 62;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 61.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.

Joint Public Agency Act, see section 13-2501.